Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-663
Release of data; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that there is a need to establish a framework for consistent release of medical record and health information from the many registries and data bases the department maintains for the State of Nebraska. The purpose of the release of data is to encourage research which will protect the health and safety of the citizens of Nebraska by assisting in the prevention, cure, and control of specific diseases or injuries.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 853;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 743.